Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.04.540

Washington award for vocational excellence—Contributions.

The workforce training and education coordinating board may accept any and all donations, grants, bequests, and devices, conditional or otherwise, or money, property, service, or other things of value which may be received from any federal, state, or local agency, any institution, person, firm, or corporation, public and private, to be held, used, or applied for the purposes of the Washington award for vocational excellence program. The workforce training and education coordinating board shall encourage maximum participation from business, labor, and community groups. The workforce training and education coordinating board shall also coordinate, where feasible, the contribution activities of the various participants.

The workforce training and education coordinating board shall not make expenditures from funds collected under this section until February 15, 1985.

[ 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 5; 1984 c 267 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1995 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 28C.04.520.